Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3024. Individuals’ tax and tax on estates and trusts.

For taxable year 2001, and each taxable year thereafter, a tax measured by Idaho taxable income as defined in this chapter is hereby imposed upon every individual, trust, or estate required by this chapter to file a return.

The tax imposed upon individuals, trusts and estates shall be computed at the following rates:

In case a joint return is filed by husband and wife pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3031, Idaho Code, the tax imposed by this section shall be twice the tax which would be imposed on one-half (1/2) of the aggregate Idaho taxable income. For the purposes of this section, a return of a surviving spouse, as defined in section 2(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, and a head of household, as defined in section 2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be treated as a joint return and the tax imposed shall be twice the tax which would be imposed on one-half (1/2) of the Idaho taxable income.

In the case of a trust that is an electing small business trust as defined in section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, the special rules for taxation of such trusts contained in section 641 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply except that the maximum individual rate provided in this section shall apply in computing tax due under this chapter.
(d) The state tax commission shall compute and publish Idaho income tax liability for taxpayers at the midpoint of each bracket of Idaho taxable income in fifty dollar ($50.00) steps to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), rounding such calculations to the nearest dollar. Taxpayers having income within such brackets shall file returns based upon and pay taxes according to the schedule thus established. The state tax commission shall promulgate rules defining the conditions upon which such returns shall be filed.

When Idaho taxable income is: The rate is:

Less than $1,000 One and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%)

$1,000 but less than $2,000 $11.25, plus three and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (3.125%) of the amount over $1,000

$2,000 but less than $3,000 $42.50, plus three and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (3.625%) of the amount over $2,000

$3,000 but less than $4,000 $78.75, plus four and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (4.625%) of the amount over $3,000

$4,000 but less than $5,000 $125, plus five and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (5.625%) of the amount over $4,000

$5,000 but less than $7,500 $181.25, plus six and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (6.625%) of the amount over $5,000

$7,500 and over $346.88, plus six and nine hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (6.925%) of the amount over $7,500

For taxable year 2000 and each year thereafter, the state tax commission shall prescribe a factor which shall be used to compute the Idaho income tax brackets provided in subsection (a) of this section. The factor shall provide an adjustment to the Idaho tax brackets so that inflation will not result in a tax increase. The Idaho tax brackets shall be adjusted as follows: multiply the bracket amounts by the percentage (the consumer price index for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year to which the adjusted brackets will apply divided by the consumer price index for calendar year 1998). For the purpose of this computation, the consumer price index for any calendar year is the average of the consumer price index as of the close of the twelve (12) month period for the immediately preceding calendar year, without regard to any subsequent adjustments, as adopted by the state tax commission. This adoption shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The consumer price index shall mean the consumer price index for all U.S. urban consumers published by the United States department of labor. The state tax commission shall annually include the factor as provided in this subsection to multiply against Idaho taxable income in the brackets above to arrive at that year’s Idaho taxable income for tax bracket purposes.

§ 63-3024A. Food tax credits and refunds.

Any resident individual who is required to file and who has filed an Idaho income tax return shall be allowed a credit against taxes due under the Idaho income tax act for the taxpayer, the taxpayer’s spouse, and each dependent, as defined in section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code, claimed on the taxpayer’s Idaho income tax return, and awarded by the court under section 32-706, Idaho Code, if applicable. For tax years 2015 and after, the credit is one hundred dollars ($100). If taxes due are less than the total credit allowed, the taxpayer shall be paid a refund equal to the balance of the unused credit.

A resident individual who is not required to file an Idaho income tax return and for whom no credit or refund is allowed under any other subsection of this section shall, subject to the limitations of subsections (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8) of this section, be entitled to a refund in the amount provided in subsection (1) of this section.

A resident individual who has reached his sixty-fifth birthday before the end of his taxable year and who has claimed the credit available under subsection (1) of this section, in addition to the amount of credit or refund due under subsection (1) of this section, shall be entitled to twenty dollars ($20.00), which shall be claimed as a credit against any taxes due under the Idaho income tax act. If taxes due are less than the total credit allowed, the individual shall be paid a refund equal to the balance of the unused credit.

Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, a credit or refund under this section is only available if the individual for whom a personal exemption is claimed is a resident of the state of Idaho.

In no event shall more than one (1) taxpayer be allowed a credit or refund for the same personal exemption, or under more than one (1) subsection of this section.

In the event that a credit or refund is attributable to any individual for whom assistance under the federal food stamp program was received for any month or part of a month during the taxable year for which the credit or refund is claimed, the credit or refund allowed under this section shall be in proportion to the number of months of the year in which no assistance was received.

In the event that a credit or refund is attributable to any individual who has been incarcerated for any month or part of a month during the taxable year for which the credit or refund is claimed, the credit or refund allowed under this section shall be in proportion to the number of months of the year in which the individual was not incarcerated.

No credit or refund shall be paid that is attributable to an individual residing illegally in the United States.

Any part-year resident entitled to a credit under this section shall receive a proportionate credit reflecting the part of the year in which he was domiciled in this state.

Any refund shall be paid to such individual only upon his making application therefor, at such time and in such manner as may be prescribed by the state tax commission. The state tax commission shall prescribe the method by which the refund is to be made to the taxpayer. The refunds authorized by this section shall be paid from the state refund fund in the same manner as the refunds authorized by section 63-3067, Idaho Code.
(11) An application for any refund that is due and payable under the provisions of this section must be filed with the state tax commission within three (3) years of:

The due date, including extensions, of the return required under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, if the applicant is required to file a return; or

The fifteenth day of April of the year following the year to which the application relates if the applicant is not required to file a return.

(12) The state tax commission shall provide income tax payers with the irrevocable option of donating credited funds accruing pursuant to this section. Any funds so donated shall be remitted from the refund fund to the cooperative welfare fund, created pursuant to section 56-401, Idaho Code, and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing low-income Idahoans with assistance in paying home energy costs.

§ 63-3024B. Income tax credits. [Null and void.]

§ 63-3025. Tax on corporate income.

For taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 2001, a tax is hereby imposed on the Idaho taxable income of a corporation, other than an S corporation, which transacts or is authorized to transact business in this state or which has income attributable to this state. The tax shall be equal to six and nine hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (6.925%) of Idaho taxable income.

In the case of an S corporation that is required to file a return under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, a tax is hereby imposed at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section upon both:

Net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state. The amount of net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state shall be computed in accordance with section 1374 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho Code.

Excess net passive income attributable to this state. The amount of excess net passive income attributable to this state shall be computed in accordance with section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho Code.

The tax imposed by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be less than twenty dollars ($20.00); provided further that the twenty dollar ($20.00) minimum payment shall not be collected from nonproductive mining corporations.

The tax imposed by this section shall not apply to corporations taxed pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3025A, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3025A. Franchise tax.

For taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 2001, a franchise tax shall be imposed upon any corporation, other than an S corporation, for the privilege of exercising its corporate franchise within the state during such taxable year including, but not limited to, corporations engaged in business in Idaho for the exclusive purpose of performing contracts with the United States department of energy at the Idaho national laboratory or any successor organization, which tax shall be measured by income which is attributable to this state under the provisions of this chapter and which tax shall be at the rate provided in section 63-3025, Idaho Code.

In the case of an S corporation that is required to file a return under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, a tax is hereby imposed at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section upon both:

Net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state. The amount of net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state shall be computed in accordance with section 1374 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho Code.

Excess net passive income attributable to this state. The amount of excess net passive income attributable to this state shall be computed in accordance with section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho Code.

The tax imposed by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be less than twenty dollars ($20.00); provided further that the twenty dollar ($20.00) minimum payment shall not be collected from nonproductive mining corporations; but the twenty dollar ($20.00) minimum tax shall apply to corporations qualified to file returns and actually filing returns under the provisions of subchapter “S” of the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3025B. Organizations exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, an organization described in section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, and the additional organizations listed in this section shall be specifically exempt from taxation under this chapter unless such exemption is denied under section 502, 503, 504 or 6033j of the Internal Revenue Code:

Fraternal beneficiary societies, orders or associations, operating under the lodge system or for the exclusive benefit of the members of a fraternity itself operating under the lodge system;

Farmer’s or other mutual hail, cyclone, casualty or fire insurance companies or associations, including interinsurers and reciprocal underwriters of the same class, the income of which is used or held only for the purpose of paying losses or expenses;

Federal land banks and national farm loan associations as provided in the farm credit act of 1971, as amended.

Farmer’s cooperatives shall be exempt from taxation under this chapter to the extent exempted by section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Federal savings and loan associations shall not be exempt from taxation under this chapter.

Unrelated business income as defined in the Internal Revenue Code shall be subject to taxation under this chapter.

§ 63-3025C. Corporations exempt from minimum tax.

The minimum tax provisions of sections 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, shall not apply to any corporation which is not organized for profit and is not required to pay any federal tax on unrelated business income under the provisions of section 511 of the internal revenue code.

§ 63-3025D. Payment for dependents sixty-five years of age or older or persons with developmental disabilities.

In lieu of the deduction from taxable income allowed by section 63-3022E, Idaho Code, a resident individual who maintains a household, which includes as an immediate member of the family residing in that household, one (1) or more individuals sixty-five (65) years of age or older or individuals with developmental disabilities, as defined in subsection (5) of section 66-402, Idaho Code, regardless of the age of the person when such developmental disability appeared, each of whom receives more than one-half (1/2) of his or her support for the year from the individual who maintains the household, shall be entitled to a payment from the refund account of one hundred dollars ($100) for each such elderly member of the family or family member with a developmental disability. Any such payment shall be paid to such individual only upon his making application therefor at such time and in such manner as may be prescribed by the state tax commission.

No more than three (3) such payments shall be made under the provisions of this section to any one (1) individual in any calendar year.

No payment may be claimed under the provisions of this section by the individual himself except as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

A credit of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be allowed under this section for a person with a developmental disability as defined in subsection (5) of section 66-402, Idaho Code, who is filing his own tax return.

§ 63-3026. Computing Idaho taxable income of resident individuals, trusts and estates.

The Idaho taxable income of resident individuals, trusts or estates shall be computed by making appropriate adjustments under the provisions of section 63-3022, Idaho Code, to the taxable income of the taxpayer.

§ 63-3026A. Computing Idaho taxable income of part-year or nonresident individuals, trusts and estates.

For nonresident individuals, trusts, or estates the term “Idaho taxable income” includes only those components of Idaho taxable income as computed for a resident which are derived from or related to sources within Idaho. This is to be computed without the deductions for either the standard deduction or itemized deductions or personal exemptions except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

For part-year resident individuals, trusts or estates the term “Idaho taxable income” includes the total of: (a) Idaho taxable income as computed for a resident for the portion of the tax period during which a taxpayer is domiciled in or is residing in Idaho, plus (b) those components of Idaho taxable income which are derived from or related to sources within Idaho for that portion of the tax period during which a taxpayer is not domiciled in and is not residing in Idaho. This is to be computed without the deductions for either the standard deduction or itemized deductions or personal exemptions except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

For the purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

Income shall be considered derived from or relating to sources within Idaho when such income is attributable to or resulting from:

Any business, trade, profession or occupation conducted or carried on in this state, including the distributive share of partnership income and deductions, and the pro rata share of S corporation income and deductions. Partnership income, including guaranteed payments pursuant to section 707 of the Internal Revenue Code, is sourced to Idaho based upon the Idaho apportionment factor of the partnership; excluding:

Guaranteed payment to a retired partner per 4 U.S.C. section 114(b)(1)(I) that is sourced to the recipient’s state of domicile;

Guaranteed payment to an individual partner up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in any calendar year is sourced as compensation for services. The amount of the guaranteed payment in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is sourced to Idaho based upon the partnership’s Idaho apportionment factor. The two hundred fifty thousand dollar ($250,000) amount will be adjusted annually by multiplying the amount by the percentage (the consumer price index for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year to which the adjusted amount will apply divided by the consumer price index for calendar year 2013) as defined in section 63-3024, Idaho Code;

The ownership or disposition of any interest in real or tangible personal property located in this state;

The ownership or disposition of any interest in intangible personal property only to the extent that such property is employed in a business, trade, profession or occupation conducted or carried on in this state. Provided however, that interest income from an installment sale of real or tangible personal property shall constitute income from sources within this state to the extent that the property sold was located within this state. Provided further, that interest income received by a partner or shareholder of a partnership or S corporation from such partnership or S corporation shall constitute income from sources within this state to the extent that the partnership or S corporation is transacting business within this state;
(iv) A resident estate or trust; provided however, that income distributed to beneficiaries of an estate or trust shall constitute income from sources within this state only to the extent the income would be Idaho source income if such income had been received directly by a nonresident individual;

A nonresident estate or trust to the extent the income and deductions of the nonresident estate or trust were derived from or related to sources within this state;

The conduct of pari-mutuel wagering, charitable gaming or any other form of gambling taking place within this state, except as expressly limited in section 67-7439, Idaho Code;

Gains or losses realized from the sale or other disposition of a partnership interest or stock in an S corporation to the extent of the partnership’s or S corporation’s Idaho apportionment factor in the taxable year immediately preceding the year of sale. In the case of a nonresident individual who sells the nonresident’s interest in a publicly traded partnership defined in section 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code doing business in Idaho, the gains or losses shall be determined using the amount described in section 751 of the Internal Revenue Code, multiplied by the apportionment factor for the year in which the sale occurred.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section, transactions and investments made, placed or directed by Idaho resident registered broker-dealers and investment advisers or institutions exempt from registration under the Idaho securities act in securities listed with or through the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange or any other stock exchange registered with the United States securities and exchange commission and approved by the director of the department of finance which generate dividends, interest, capital gains or similar profits or returns for nonresidents not otherwise subject to Idaho income taxation shall not result in the intangible property being deemed to have a situs outside the domicile of the owner.

Nonresident individuals shall not be taxable on investment income from a qualified investment partnership. For purposes of this paragraph, a “qualified investment partnership” means a partnership, as defined in section 63-3006B, Idaho Code, that derives at least ninety percent (90%) of its gross income from investments that produce income that would not be taxable to a nonresident individual if the investment were held by that individual.

Compensation paid by the United States for active service in the armed forces of the United States, performed by an individual not domiciled in this state, shall not constitute income derived from or related to sources within this state.

The income of nonresident or part-year resident individuals, trusts or estates which is derived from or related to sources both within and without this state shall be attributable to this state in the manner prescribed in the rules of the state tax commission.

In computing the Idaho taxable income of a part-year or nonresident individual, trust or estate, the standard deduction or itemized deductions, as defined in section 63-3022(j), Idaho Code, if applicable, and the exemptions, as defined in section 151 of the Internal Revenue Code or any allowance in lieu of such deduction, shall be allowed in the proportion that paragraph (a) of this subsection bears to paragraph (b) of this subsection:

The Idaho taxable income of the taxpayer modified as follows:

No allowance shall be made for either the standard deduction or itemized deductions;

No deduction shall be made for personal exemptions or any allowance in lieu of such deduction.

No deduction shall be made for personal exemptions or any allowance in lieu of such deduction;

Compensation for active military service in the armed forces shall not be deducted;

Income earned within the original exterior boundaries of any federally created Indian reservation by an enrolled Indian in a federally recognized Indian tribe on a federally recognized Indian reservation shall be added if not otherwise included.

In their entirety if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state and the taxpayer is not organized under the laws of or taxable in the state in which the property is utilized.

The Idaho taxable income as would be calculated for a resident of Idaho modified as follows:
(i) No allowance shall be made for either a standard deduction or itemized deductions;

An adjustment may be made to eliminate distortions in the amount of net income attributable to a taxpayer’s activities within the state of Idaho. Such deductions shall be limited to circumstances involving itemized deductions as referred to in subsection (4) of this section and which reflect:

A failure to reflect the net income or deduction after reimbursements have been received; or

A failure to reflect the net amount of mortgage interest income or expense from activities within Idaho.

For the purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, deductions and adjustments allowed in computing the Idaho taxable income of nonresident and part-year resident individuals, trusts and estates shall be prescribed in the rules of the state tax commission. Such rules shall be based upon:

Whether or not the deduction or adjustment is related to the production of income reportable to Idaho;

Whether or not the deduction or adjustment is related to income received, expenses paid, or events of tax consequence which occurred during a portion of a taxable year that the taxpayer was domiciled in or residing in Idaho; or

Any other appropriate basis for making the adjustment. An “appropriate basis” is one which the state tax commission finds is needed to insure that the amount of Idaho taxable income is fairly and reasonably related to a taxpayer’s activities in this state.

Former Statutes Not Affected.

The 1995 enactment of the definition of Idaho source income in subsection (3) of this section did not retroactively create an ambiguity in the income tax law as it existed in 1989 and 1990. Richards v. Idaho State Tax Comm’n, 131 Idaho 476, 959 P.2d 457 (1998).